Illinois, session 104th, SB53.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Lobbyist Registration Act is amended by 5adding Section 3.2 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 170/3.2 new)7    Sec. 3.2. Prohibited offer or promise. 8    (a) A lobbyist or lobbying entity may not promise anything 9of value to an official, State employee, or a candidate for a 10State executive or State legislative office for the person's 11support, action, or inaction for a specific legislative action 12or executive action, including, but not limited to, campaign 13contributions, endorsement of candidacy, or any in-kind 14contributions supporting an official, State employee, or 15candidate for a State executive or State legislative office. A 16lobbyist or lobbying entity is prohibited from soliciting an 17official or State employee to violate Section 5-30 of the 18State Officials and Employees Ethics Act.19    (b) Nothing in this Section prevents the making or 20accepting of voluntary contributions otherwise in accordance 21with law.